Montana, session 2025, LC1703.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 15-6-133, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-6-133. Class three property -- description -- taxable percentage. (1) Class three property
includes:
(a) except as provided in subsection (1)(d), agricultural land as defined in 15-7-202;
(b) nonproductive patented mining claims outside the limits of an incorporated city or town held by
an owner for the ultimate purpose of developing the mineral interests on the property. For the purposes of this
subsection (1)(b), the following provisions apply:
(i) The claim may not include any property that is used for residential purposes, recreational
purposes as described in 70-16-301, or commercial purposes as defined in 15-1-101 or any property the
surface of which is being used for other than mining purposes or has a separate and independent value for
other purposes.
(ii) Improvements to the property that would not disqualify the parcel are taxed as otherwise
provided in this title, including that portion of the land upon which the improvements are located and that is
reasonably required for the use of the improvements.
(iii) Nonproductive patented mining claim property must be valued as if the land were devoted to
agricultural grazing use.
(c) parcels of land of 20 acres or more but less than 160 acres under one ownership that are not
eligible for valuation, assessment, and taxation as agricultural land under 15-7-202(1), which are considered to
be nonqualified agricultural land. Nonqualified agricultural land may not be devoted to a commercial or
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1703.1
industrial purpose. Nonqualified agricultural land is valued at the average productive capacity value of grazing
land.
(d) agricultural land acquired after [the effective date of this act] and owned by a nonprofit
corporation, except for:
(i) a church or religious corporation;
(ii) a school, college, or university;
(iii) a hospital, medical research organization, or facility that cares for the elderly or disabled;
(iv) an organization that provides low-income housing;
(v) a cemetery corporation;
(vi) an organization that operates a residential treatment center;
(vii) an organization that provides housing to military veterans; or
(viii) a rural cooperative utility.
(2) Subject to subsection subsections (3) and (4), class three property is taxed at 2.16% of its
productive capacity value.
(3) The taxable value of land described in subsection (1)(c) is computed by multiplying the value of
the land by seven times the taxable percentage rate for agricultural land.
(4) The taxable value of land described in subsection (1)(d) is computed by multiplying the value of
the land by 10 times the taxable percentage rate for agricultural land."

Section 2. Section 15-6-134, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-6-134. Class four property -- description -- taxable percentage. (1) Class four property
includes:
(a) subject to subsection (1)(e), all land, except that specifically included in another class;
(b) subject to subsection (1)(e):
(i) all improvements, including single-family residences, trailers, manufactured homes, or mobile
homes used as a residence, except those specifically included in another class;
(ii) appurtenant improvements to the residences, including the parcels of land upon which the
residences are located and any leasehold improvements;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1703.1
(iii) vacant residential lots; and
(iv) rental multifamily dwelling units.
(c) all improvements on land that is eligible for valuation, assessment, and taxation as agricultural
land under 15-7-202, including 1 acre of real property beneath improvements on land described in 15-6-
133(1)(c) and (1)(d). The 1 acre must be valued at market value.
(d) 1 acre of real property beneath an improvement used as a residence on land eligible for
valuation, assessment, and taxation as forest land under 15-6-143. The 1 acre must be valued at market value.
(e) all commercial and industrial property, as defined in 15-1-101, and including:
(i) all commercial and industrial property that is used or owned by an individual, a business, a
trade, a corporation, a limited liability company, or a partnership and that is used primarily for the production of
income;
(ii) all golf courses, including land and improvements actually and necessarily used for that
purpose, that consist of at least nine holes and not less than 700 lineal yards;
(iii) commercial buildings and parcels of land upon which the buildings are situated; and
(iv) vacant commercial lots.
(2) If a property includes both residential and commercial uses, the property is classified and
appraised as follows:
(a) the land use with the highest percentage of total value is the use that is assigned to the
property; and
(b) the improvements are apportioned according to the use of the improvements.
(3) (a) Except as provided in 15-24-1402, 15-24-1501, 15-24-1502, and subsection (3)(b), class
four residential property described in subsections (1)(a) through (1)(d) of this section is taxed at 1.35% of
market value.
(b) The tax rate for the portion of the market value of a single-family residential dwelling in excess
of $1.5 million is the residential property tax rate in subsection (3)(a) multiplied by 1.4.
(c) The tax rate for commercial property is the residential property tax rate in subsection (3)(a)
multiplied by 1.4.
(4) Property described in subsection (1)(e)(ii) is taxed at one-half the tax rate established in
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1703.1
subsection (3)(c)."

Section 3. Section 15-6-229, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-6-229. Exemption for land adjacent to transmission line right-of-way easement --
application -- limitations. (1) Subject to the conditions of this section, for tax years beginning after December
31, 2007, there is allowed an exemption from property taxes for land that is within 660 feet on either side of the
midpoint of a transmission line right-of-way or easement.
(2) (a) An owner or operator of a transmission line shall apply to the department for an exemption
under this section on a form provided by the department. The application must include a legal description and a
digitized certificate of survey prepared by a surveyor registered with the board of professional engineers and
professional land surveyors provided for in 2-15-1763 of the property in the county for which the exemption is
sought and other information required by the department. A separate application must be made for each county
in which an exemption is sought.
(b) An application for an exemption that would be in effect for the tax year and subsequent tax
years must be filed with the department by March 1 in the tax year that the exemption is sought.
(3) (a) The owner or operator of a transmission line shall inform the department of any change in
ownership of the land or other circumstances that may affect the eligibility of the land for the exemption. The
department shall determine whether any changes have occurred that affect the eligibility of the land for the
exemption.
(b) The exemption allowed under this section does not apply to:
(i) the boundaries of an incorporated or unincorporated city or town;
(ii) a platted and filed subdivision;
(iii) tracts of land used for residential, commercial, or industrial purposes; or
(iv) the 1 acre of land beneath improvements on land described in 15-6-133(1)(c) and (1)(d) and
15-7-206(2).
(4) For the purposes of this section, "transmission line" means an electric line with a design
capacity of 30 megavoltamperes or greater that is constructed after January 1, 2007."

- 4 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1703.1
Section 4. Section 15-18-219, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-18-219. Application for tax deed for residential property -- fee -- notice. (1) (a) If a property
tax lien attached to the property provided for in subsection (1)(b) is not redeemed in the time allowed under 15-
18-111, the assignee may file an application after the redemption period has expired with the county treasurer
for a tax deed for the property. The tax deed application must contain the same information as is required in 15-
18-211(1). The county treasurer shall charge the assignee a $25 application fee. The fee must be deposited in
the county general fund.
(b) The following property is subject to the provisions of this section if it contains a dwelling that is
currently occupied by the legal titleholder of record:
(i) land classified as residential pursuant to 15-6-134;
(ii) land classified as agricultural pursuant to 15-6-133(1)(a), and (1)(c), and (1)(d); and
(iii) land classified as forest property pursuant to 15-6-143.
(c) For the property provided for in subsection (1)(b)(ii) and (1)(b)(iii), the provisions of this section
also apply to other property of the same class that is included on the same tax bill.
(2) An assignee who applies for a tax deed pursuant to this section shall pay the county treasurer
at the time of the tax deed application:
(a) the amount required to redeem any unassigned tax liens or tax liens held by other assignees;
(b) any delinquent taxes, penalties, and interest; and
(c) current taxes due for the property.
(3) (a) The county treasurer shall have the county clerk and recorder file a notice of the tax deed
application.
(b) A person acquiring an interest in the property after the tax deed application notice has been
filed is considered to be on notice of the pending tax deed auction, and no additional notice is required. The
sale at auction of the property automatically releases any filed notice of tax deed application for the property.
(c) If the property is redeemed, the county treasurer shall file a redemption certificate, which
releases the notice of tax deed application.
(4) (a) Between May 1 and May 30 of the year in which the redemption period expires, an
assignee applying for a tax deed shall notify the parties as required in subsection (4)(b) that a tax deed will be
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1703.1
auctioned unless the property tax lien is redeemed before the date of the auction.
(b) The notice required under subsection (4)(a) must be made by certified mail, return receipt
requested, in the form required by 15-18-215 and as provided in 7-1-2121, to the current occupant, if any, of the
property and to each party, other than a utility, listed on a litigation guarantee, provided that the guarantee:
(i) has been approved by the insurance commissioner and issued by a licensed title insurance
producer;
(ii) was ordered on the property by the person required to give notice; and
(iii) lists the identities and addresses of the parties of record that have an interest or possible claim
of an interest in the property designed to disclose all parties of record that would otherwise be necessary to
name in a quiet title action.
(c) The address to which the notice must be sent is, for each party, the address disclosed by the
records in the office of the county clerk and recorder or in the litigation guarantee and, for the occupant, the
street address or other known address of the subject property.
(5) The amount of interest and costs continues to accrue until the date of redemption. The total
amount of interest and costs that must be paid for redemption must be calculated by the county treasurer as of
the date of payment.
(6) (a) The county treasurer shall notify the assignee of the obligation to give notice under
subsection (4) between January 1 and January 31 of the year in which the redemption period expires. The
notice of obligation must be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the assignee at the address
contained on the assignment certificate provided for in 15-17-323.
(b) If the assignee fails to give notice as required by subsection (4), as evidenced by failure to file
proof of notice with the county clerk and recorder as required in subsection (6)(c), the county treasurer shall
cancel the property tax lien evidenced by the tax lien certificate and the assignment certificate. Upon
cancellation of the property tax lien, the county treasurer shall file with the county clerk and recorder a notice of
cancellation on a form provided for in 15-18-217.
(c) Proof of notice must be given as provided in 15-18-216 and must be filed with the county clerk
and recorder. An assignee must file proof of notice with the county clerk and recorder within 30 days of the
mailing or publishing of the notice. Once filed, the proof of notice is prima facie evidence of the sufficiency of
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1703.1
the notice."

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – ****